src-fst-morphology-stems-abbreviations.lexc.md
# Veps abbreviations 
[Original file](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vep/blob/main/src/fst/stems/abbreviations.lexc)

## Lexica for adding tags and periods

Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor

**LEXICON Abbreviation** 

Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not

**LEXICON ab** 

**LEXICON ab-noun** 

Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

**LEXICON ab-nodot-noun**  The bulk

**LEXICON ab-nodot** 

**LEXICON ab-dot** 

**LEXICON ab-dot-noun** 

The idea is that the nominal ones may have case, like e.g. P.E.N.

## The abbreviation lexicon itself

**LEXICON noperiod** 

###           Intransitive abbreviations           

**LEXICON ITRAB** 

###    Transitive number-related abbreviations      !

**LEXICON TRNUMAB** 

###              Transitive abbreviations           !

**LEXICON TRAB** 

**LEXICON TRAB** 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vep/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc)</small>

---
